Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1808
Real property
taxes; delinquent tax sale; payment by purchaser; resale.

The person purchasing any real property shall pay to the county treasurer the amount
of taxes, interest, and cost thereon, which payment may be made in the same
funds receivable by law in the payment of taxes. If any purchaser fails to
so pay, then the real property shall at once again be offered as if no such
sale had been made.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 200, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 6528;

C.S.1922, § 6056;

C.S.1929, § 77-2008;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 12, p. 643;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 12, p. 429;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 12, p. 614;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2008;

R.S.1943, § 77-1808;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 144;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 117;

Laws 2013, LB341, § 2.

Sale is not invalid though payment is not made immediately, where treasurer is unable to receive it. Leavitt v. S. D. Mercer Co., 64 Neb. 31, 89 N.W. 426 (1902); Ure v. Bunn, 3 Neb. Unof. 61, 90 N.W. 904 (1902).

Failure of treasurer to offer land for resale does not invalidate taxes. Green v. Hellman, 61 Neb. 875, 86 N.W. 912 (1901).